Mississippi statutes. Title 65. Highways, Bridges and Ferries
Article 1. Mississippi River Bridge Revenue Bond Law.

§ 65-25-1.
Citation.

This article shall be known, and may be cited, as the “Mississippi River Bridge Revenue Bond Law”.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8448; Laws, 1938, ch. 283.

§ 65-25-3.
Issuance of bridge revenue bonds.

Any county or city in this state is hereby authorized and empowered:

To acquire by purchase or by condemnation and to construct, or partly acquire and partly construct, and to improve, operate, and maintain bridges wholly or partially within the state within such county or city or within twenty miles of the territory over which such county or city has jurisdiction and which are over the Mississippi River; and

To issue bridge revenue bonds of such county or city, payable from bridge earnings, to pay the cost of such bridges.

No revenue bonds and no liens securing such bonds shall be repaid in whole or in part from any funds arising from taxation, nor shall any such bonds or liens given under authority of this article constitute a lien on any other property of a city or county other than the bridge constructed or acquired under this article or a pledge of the credit of such agency unless specifically so voted by a majority of the qualified electors voting in favor of same in an election held according to law for the purpose of so authorizing.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8449; Laws, 1938, ch. 283.

§ 65-25-5.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the following words and terms shall have the following meanings:

The word “municipality” shall be deemed to include any county or city in this state.

The word “bridge” shall be deemed to include the substructure and the superstructure of the bridge and the approaches thereto and also all property, rights, easements, and franchises relating thereto and deemed necessary or convenient for the operation thereof, and shall embrace bridges which are now in existence or hereafter constructed and wholly or partly within the municipality or are within twenty miles of the territory over which such municipality has jurisdiction and which are over the Mississippi River, and shall also embrace combined railroad and highway bridges, as well as highway bridges.

The term “governing body” shall mean the board of supervisors of a county or the council, board of aldermen, or other legislative body of a city.

The word “improvements” shall mean such repairs, replacements, additions, and betterments of and to a bridge acquired by purchase or by condemnation as are deemed necessary to place it in a safe and efficient condition for the use of the public, if such repairs, replacements, additions, and betterments are ordered prior to the sale of any bonds for the acquisition of such bridge.

The term “cost of bridge”, as applied to a bridge to be acquired by purchase or by condemnation, shall include the purchase price or the amount of the award, cost of improvements, financing charges, interest during any period of disuse before completion of improvements, cost of traffic estimates and of engineering and legal expenses, plans, specifications and surveys, estimates of cost and of revenues, other expenses necessary or incident to determining the feasibility or practicability of the enterprise, administrative expense, and such other expenses as may be necessary or incident to the financing herein authorized, and the acquisition of the bridge and the placing of the bridge in operation.

The term “cost of bridge”, as applied to a bridge to be constructed, shall embrace the cost of construction, the cost of all land, property, rights, easements, and franchises acquired, which are deemed necessary for such construction, the cost of all machinery and equipment, financing charges, interest prior to and during construction and for six months after completion of construction, cost of traffic estimates and of engineering and of legal expenses, plans, specifications, surveys, estimates of cost and of revenues, other expenses necessary or incident to determining the feasibility or practicability of the enterprise, administrative expense, and such other expenses as may be necessary or incident to the financing herein authorized and the construction of the bridge and the placing of the bridge in operation.

The word “owner” shall include all individuals, incorporated companies, copartnerships, societies, or associations having any title or interest in any property, rights, easements, or franchises authorized to be acquired by this article.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8450; Laws, 1938, ch. 283.

§ 65-25-7.
Purchase of bridges.

Any municipality is hereby authorized and empowered to acquire by purchase, whenever it shall deem such purchase expedient, any toll bridge located as provided in Section 65-25-3, or any such toll bridge partly constructed, or any franchises, easements, permits, or contracts for the construction of any such bridge, or any such toll bridge or facilities thereof which may be under lease in whole or in part and which may be so acquired subject to the terms of such lease, all upon such terms and at such prices as may be reasonable and can be agreed upon between such municipality and the owner thereof, title thereto to be taken in the name of such municipality. For the purpose of paying the cost of such acquisition, any municipality is hereby authorized and empowered to issue its bridge revenue bonds as hereinafter provided.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8451; Laws, 1938, ch. 283.

§ 65-25-9.
Condemnation of bridges and property.

Any municipality, whenever a reasonable price cannot be agreed upon, or whenever the owner is legally incapacitated or is absent or is unable to convey valid title or is unknown, is hereby authorized and empowered to acquire by condemnation any such bridge or bridges or interest or interests therein, and any land, rights, easements, franchises, and other property deemed necessary or convenient for the improvement or the efficient operation of any property acquired or constructed under this article, or for the purpose of constructing any bridge or portion thereof hereunder, or for securing right of way leading to any such bridge or its approaches, in the manner hereinafter provided. Such condemnation proceedings shall be instituted by a written application of the governing body of such municipality and shall be conducted, and the compensation to be paid shall be ascertained and paid, in the manner provided by Chapter 33, Title 11, Mississippi Code of 1972, or by the laws of the state where such proceedings may be conducted. And any municipality is further authorized and empowered to exercise in this state and in any adjoining state such powers of eminent domain as may be conferred upon such municipality by any act of the Congress of the United States now in force or which may hereafter be enacted. Title to any property condemned by a municipality shall be taken in its name. No municipality shall be under any obligation to accept and pay for any property condemned or any costs incidental to any condemnation proceedings, and shall, in no event, pay for the same except from the funds provided by this article. In any condemnation proceedings, the court having jurisdiction of the suit, action, or proceedings may make such orders as may be just to such municipality and to the owners of the property to be condemned, and may require an undertaking or other security to secure such owners against any loss or damage to be sustained by reason of the failure of such municipality to accept and pay for the property; but such undertaking or security shall impose no liability upon such municipality, except such as may be paid from the funds provided under the authority of this article.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8452; Laws, 1938, ch. 283.

§ 65-25-11.
Improvement of bridges acquired.

It shall be the duty of the governing body of any municipality, at or before the time any such bridge shall be acquired by such municipality by purchase or by condemnation, to determine what repairs, replacements, additions, or betterments will be necessary to place the bridge in safe and efficient condition for the use of the public, and to cause an estimate of the cost of such improvement to be made. The governing body of the municipality shall authorize such improvements before the sale of any bridge revenue bonds for the acquisition of such bridge, and the cost of such improvements shall be paid for out of the proceeds of such bonds.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8453; Laws, 1938, ch. 283.

§ 65-25-13.
Construction of bridges.

Any municipality is hereby authorized and empowered to construct, whenever it shall deem such construction expedient, any toll bridge located as provided in Section 65-25-3. Such municipality is hereby authorized to purchase within this state and within any adjoining state, solely from funds provided under the authority of this article, such lands, structures, rights of way, franchises, easements, and other interests in lands, including lands under water and riparian rights of any person, copartnership, association, railroad or other corporation, or municipality or political subdivision, deemed necessary for the construction of any such bridge, upon such terms and at such prices as may be considered by it to be reasonable and can be agreed upon between it and the owner thereof, and to take title thereto in the name of such municipality. The State of Mississippi hereby consents to the use of all lands lying under water, which are within the state and are necessary for the construction and operation of any such bridge and the approaches and appurtenances thereto.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8454; Laws, 1938, ch. 283.

§ 65-25-15.
Bridge revenue bonds.

The governing body of any municipality is hereby authorized to provide by resolution, at one time or from time to time, for the issuance of bridge revenue bonds of such municipality for the purpose of paying the cost as hereinabove defined of any one or more such bridges, which resolution shall recite an estimate of such cost. The principal and interest of such bonds shall be payable solely from the special fund herein provided for such payment. The bonds of each issue shall be dated, shall bear interest at such rate or rates not exceeding six percent (6%) per annum, payable semiannually, shall mature at such time or times, not exceeding forty years from their date or dates, as may be determined by the governing body of such municipality, and may be made redeemable before maturity, at the option of the municipality, at such price or prices and under such terms and conditions as may be fixed by the governing body of such municipality prior to the issuance of the bonds. The principal and interest of such bonds may be made payable in any lawful medium. The governing body of such municipality shall determine the form of the bonds, including any interest coupons to be attached thereto, and shall fix the denomination or denominations of the bonds and the place or places of payment of principal and interest thereof, which may be at any bank or trust company within or without the state. The bonds and any interest coupons attached thereto shall be executed in such manner as shall be determined by the governing body of the municipality. In case any officer whose signature shall appear on the bonds or coupons shall cease to be such officer before the delivery of such bonds, such signature shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes the same as if he had remained in office until such delivery. All bridge revenue bonds issued under the provisions of this article shall have and are hereby declared to have, as between successive holders, all the qualities and incidents of negotiable instruments under the Uniform Commercial Code of the state. Provision may be made for the registration of any of the bonds in the name of the owner as to principal alone and also as to both principal and interest and for the issuance of new coupon bonds in exchange for bonds registered as to both principal and interest. The governing body of such municipality may sell such bonds in such manner and for such price as it may determine to be for the best interests of such municipality, but no such sale shall be made at a price so low as to require the payment of interest on the money received therefor at more than six per centum per annum, computed with relation to the absolute maturity of the bonds in accordance with standard tables of bond values. The proceeds of such bonds shall be used solely for the payment of the cost of the bridge or bridges, and shall be disbursed under such restrictions, if any, as the governing body thereof may provide. If the proceeds of such bonds, by error of calculation or otherwise, shall be less than the cost of the bridge or bridges, additional bonds may in like manner be issued to provide the amount of such deficit, and unless otherwise provided in the trust indenture hereinafter mentioned, shall be deemed to be of the same issue and shall be entitled to payment from the same fund without preference or priority of the bonds first issued for the same bridge or bridges. If the proceeds of bonds issued for any bridge or bridges shall exceed the cost thereof, the surplus shall be paid into the fund hereinafter provided for the payment of principal and interest of such bonds. Prior to the preparation of definitive bonds, the municipality may, under like restrictions, issue temporary bonds, with or without coupons, exchangeable for definitive bonds upon the issuance of the latter. The governing body of any such municipality may also provide for the replacement of any bond which shall become mutilated or be destroyed or lost. Such bridge revenue bonds may be issued without any other proceedings or the happening of any other conditions or things than those proceedings, conditions, and things which are specified and required by this article. The powers conferred by this article shall be in addition to the power conferred by any other law, general, special or local, and this article, without reference to any other statute or to any charter, shall be deemed full authority for the purpose hereof. In the discretion of the governing body of any municipality, bridge revenue bonds of a single issue may be issued for the purpose of paying the cost of any one or more bridges.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8455; Laws, 1938, ch. 283.

§ 65-25-17.
Lien upon bond proceeds.

All moneys received from any bridge revenue bonds issued pursuant to this article shall be applied solely to the payment of the cost of the bridge or bridges, or to the appurtenant sinking fund, and there is hereby created and granted a lien upon such moneys until so applied, in favor of the holders of such bonds or the trustee hereinafter provided in respect of such bonds.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8456; Laws, 1938, ch. 283.

§ 65-25-19.
Trust indenture.

In the discretion of the governing body of any municipality issuing its bonds under the provisions of this article, each or any issue of such bonds may be secured by a trust indenture by and between such municipality and a corporate trustee, which may be any trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company within or outside of the state, which trust indenture may, in the discretion of the governing body, convey or mortgage the revenues, the bridge, or any part thereof.

Either the resolution providing for the issuance of bridge revenue bonds or such trust indenture may contain such provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the bondholders as may be reasonable and proper and not in violation of law, including covenants setting forth the duties of such municipality and the governing body thereof in relation to the acquisition, construction, improvement, maintenance, operation, repair, and insurance of the bridges, and the custody, safeguarding, and application of all moneys; and may also provide that the bridge or bridges shall be acquired, constructed, or partly acquired and partly constructed, and paid for under the supervision and approval of consulting engineers employed or designated by the governing body of such municipality and satisfactory to the original purchasers of the bonds issued therefor; and may also require that the security given by contractors and by any depository of the proceeds of the bonds or revenues of the bridges or other moneys pertaining thereto be satisfactory to such purchasers. It shall be lawful for any bank or trust company incorporated under the laws of this state to act as such depository and to furnish such indemnifying bonds or to pledge such securities as may be required by the governing body of such municipality. Such indenture may set forth the rights and remedies of the bondholders and of the trustee, and may restrict the individual right of action of bondholders as is customary in trust indentures securing bonds and debentures of corporations. Except as in this article otherwise provided, the governing body of such municipality may provide, by resolution or by such trust indenture, for the payment of the proceeds of the sale of the bonds and the revenues of the bridges to such officer, board, or depository as it may determine for the custody thereof and for the method of disbursement thereof, with such safeguards and restrictions as it may determine. All expenses incurred in carrying out such trust indenture may be treated as a part of the cost of maintenance, operation, and repair of the bridge or bridges affected by such indenture.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8457; Laws, 1938, ch. 283.

§ 65-25-21.
Bridge tolls.

The governing body of any municipality issuing its bonds under the provisions of this article is hereby authorized to fix and to revise from time to time tolls for transit over such bridges, to charge and collect the same, and to contract with any person, partnership, association, or corporation desiring the use of any bridge, its approaches, appurtenances, or any part thereof for placing thereon water, gas, oil pipe lines, telephone, telegraph, electric light or power lines, railroad or street railway tracks, or for any other purpose, and to fix the terms, conditions, rates, and charges for such use. Such tolls shall be so fixed and adjusted, in respect of the aggregate of tolls from the bridge or bridges for which a single issue of bonds is issued, as to provide a fund sufficient, with other revenues of the bridge or bridges, if any, to pay (a) the cost of maintaining, repairing, and operating such bridge or bridges unless such cost shall be otherwise provided for, and (b) the bonds and the interest thereon as the same become due, subject, however, to any applicable law or regulation of the United States of America now in force or hereafter to be enacted or made. Such tolls shall not be subject to supervision or regulation by any state commission, board, bureau, or agency. The tolls from the bridge or bridges for which a single issue of bonds is issued, except such part thereof as may be required to pay the cost of maintaining, repairing, and operating the bridge or bridges and to provide such reserves therefor as may be provided in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds or in the trust indenture, shall be set aside at such regular intervals as may be provided in such resolution or such trust indenture, in a sinking fund which is hereby pledged to, and charged with the payment of, (1) the interest upon such bonds as such interest shall fall due, (2) the principal of the bonds as the same shall fall due, (3) the necessary fiscal agency charges for paying principal and interest, and (4) any premium upon bonds retired by call or purchase as herein provided. The use and disposition of such sinking fund shall be subject to such regulations as may be provided in the resolution authorizing the issuance of bonds or in the trust indenture, but, except as may otherwise be provided in such resolution or trust indenture, such sinking fund shall be a fund for the benefit of all bonds without distinction or priority of one over another. Subject to the provisions of the resolution authorizing the issuance of bonds or of the trust indenture, any moneys in such sinking fund in excess of an amount equal to one year’s interest on all bonds then outstanding may be applied to the purchase or redemption of bonds. All bonds so purchased or redeemed shall forthwith be cancelled and shall not again be issued.

Upon the letting of a contract for the construction of a bridge under the provisions of this article, it shall be the duty of state highway commission to proceed with the construction of any highways which may be necessary to connect such bridge with the highway system of the state and to complete the construction of such connecting highway or highways on or before the date such bridge shall be opened for traffic.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8458; Laws, 1938, ch. 283.

§ 65-25-23.
Contributions apart from bridge earnings.

Notwithstanding any of the foregoing provisions of Section 65-25-21, any municipality other than the state may, by resolution or ordinance passed prior or subsequent to the issuance of its bonds under the provisions of this article, or by such trust indenture, covenant to contribute funds apart from bridge earnings to pay all or any part of the cost of maintaining, repairing, and operating any bridge or bridges acquired, constructed, or improved by it under the provisions of this article, and may likewise covenant to make such contribution to the payment of bonds and the interest thereon issued pursuant to this article, by another municipality. Such covenant, authorized by such resolution, ordinance, or trust indenture, shall have the force of a contract between such municipality and the holders of the bonds issued on account of such bridge or bridges, and shall obligate the municipality to raise such funds. Any municipality in the state may aid any other municipality in the state and contribute funds to pay any part of the cost of acquiring, constructing, maintaining, repairing, and operating any bridge or bridges; and the twenty miles limitation contained in Section 65-25-3 shall have no application and shall not be construed to restrict such municipality from contributing such funds to aid the municipality which issues its revenue bonds as herein provided. But no such contribution shall be made unless authorized by a majority of the qualified electors voting in favor of same in an election held according to law for the purpose of so authorizing.

No municipality shall enter into any contract or covenant provided for in the first paragraph of this section without there being first held an election in which a majority of those voting shall authorize said covenant or contract to be entered into by said municipality.

The State of Mississippi, acting by and through the state highway commission as an agency thereof, may receive from the federal government or any agency thereof funds specifically allotted or appropriated by the federal government for constructing, acquiring, maintaining, and repairing bridges across the Mississippi River, which the state highway commission may by resolution allocate to pay the costs or any part thereof of constructing, acquiring, maintaining, repairing, and operating any bridge or bridges acquired, constructed, or improved under this article and to the payment of principal and interest of such bonds.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8459; Laws, 1938, ch. 283; Laws, 1938, Ex. ch. 75.

§ 65-25-25.
Cessation of tolls.

When the particular bonds issued for any bridge or bridges and the interest thereon shall have been paid, or a sufficient amount shall have been provided for their payment and shall continue to be held for that purpose, the municipality issuing such bonds shall cease to charge tolls for the use of such bridge or bridges; and thereafter such bridge or bridges shall be free unless tolls are required for maintaining, repairing, and operating such bridge or bridges due to the lack of funds from other sources than tolls. Such provisions shall not apply to common carriers, transportation companies, bus lines, and any one transporting passengers or freight for hire, but shall apply only to the use of highway portion of bridge by traveling public and, as respects any other use, the municipality may continue to fix and collect such tolls and charges as it may deem in the public interest.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8460; Laws, 1938, ch. 283.

§ 65-25-27.
Remedies of bondholders and trustee.

Any holder of any bonds issued under the provisions of this article or of any of the coupons attached thereto, and the trustee under the trust indenture, if any, except to the extent the rights herein given may be restricted by resolution passed before the issuance of the bonds or by the trust indenture, may either at law or in equity, by suit, action, mandamus, or other proceeding, protect and enforce any and all rights granted hereunder or under such resolution or trust indenture, and may enforce and compel performance of all duties required by this article, or by such resolution or trust indenture, to be performed by the municipality, its governing body, or by the state highway commission, or any officer thereof, including the fixing, charging, and collecting of tolls for transit over such bridges.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8461; Laws, 1938, ch. 283.

§ 65-25-29.
Contributions.

Any municipality, in addition to the revenues which may be received from the sale of bridge revenue bonds and from the collection of tolls and other bridge revenues derived under the provisions of this article, shall have authority to receive and accept from any federal agency, state, state agency, municipality, municipal agency, or other political subdivision grants for or in the aid of the construction or acquisition of any bridge, and to receive and accept contributions from any source of either money or property or other things of value, to be held, used, and applied only for the purpose for which such grants and contributions may be made.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8462; Laws, 1938, ch. 283.

§ 65-25-31.
Competing bridges and ferries.

No bridge for the use of the traveling public located as provided in Section 65-25-3 shall hereafter be constructed and operated by any county, municipal corporation, or political subdivision of the state, or by any person, copartnership, association, or corporation, and no franchise shall hereafter be granted for the operation of a ferry within fifteen miles of any toll bridge for the acquisition or construction of which bridge revenue bonds shall have been authorized under this article, except under a written permit granted by the state highway commission. No such permit shall be granted by the state highway commission until it shall ascertain by an investigation, including a hearing upon such notice and under such rules as the commission may prescribe, that there is an urgent public need for the operation of such bridge or such ferry, and that its operation will not affect the revenues of any bridge purchased or constructed under the provisions of this article so as to impair the security of any bridge revenue bonds issued for the acquisition or construction of such bridge.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8463; Laws, 1938, ch. 283.

§ 65-25-33.
General powers of municipalities.

The governing body of any municipality issuing its bonds under the provisions of this article shall have power to make and enter into all contracts or agreements necessary or incidental to the execution of its powers under this article, may employ engineering, architectural and construction experts, inspectors, attorneys, and such other employees as may be deemed necessary, and may fix their compensation. All such compensation and all expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of this article shall be paid solely from funds provided under the authority of this article, and no liability or obligation shall be incurred hereunder beyond the extent to which money shall have been provided under the authority of this article. Any municipality may exercise any powers which may be conferred upon it by acts of the Congress of the United States or any adjoining state in which a portion of such bridge may be located or which are necessary or convenient for the execution of its powers under this article. All public or private property damaged or destroyed in carrying out the powers granted under this article shall be restored or repaired and placed in its original condition, as nearly as practicable, or adequate compensation made therefor out of funds provided by this article.

The powers and duties of municipalities and the governing bodies thereof hereinabove enumerated in this article shall not be construed as a limitation on the general powers or duties of such municipalities or the governing bodies thereof. It shall be the duty of the governing body of any municipality issuing its bonds pursuant to the provisions of this article, in addition to the powers and duties enumerated in this article, to do and perform any and all things and acts necessary in the construction or acquisition, maintenance, and operation of any bridge to be constructed or acquired under the provisions of this article, to the end that such bridge or bridges may become and be operated free of tolls as early as possible and practicable, subject only to the express limitations of this article and the limitations of the other laws and constitutional provisions applicable thereto.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8464; Laws, 1938, ch. 283.

§ 65-25-35.
Bridge revenue refunding bonds.

Any municipality is hereby authorized to provide by resolution for the issuance of bridge revenue refunding bonds of such municipality for the purpose of refunding any bridge revenue bonds issued under the provisions of this article and then outstanding. The issuance of such bridge revenue refunding bonds, the maturities and other details thereof, the rights of the holders thereof, and the duties of such municipality and of any other municipality or the state highway commission in respect to the same, shall be governed by the foregoing provisions of this article insofar as the same may be applicable, and by the following provisions:

No bridge revenue refunding bonds shall be delivered unless delivered in exchange for bridge revenue bonds to be refunded thereby, except in the amount necessary to provide for the payment of matured or redeemable bridge revenue bonds or bridge revenue bonds maturing or redeemable within three months, including any redemption premium thereon.

No bridge revenue refunding bonds shall be issued unless issued to refund bridge revenue bonds which have matured or will mature within six months, or unless the interest rate of the bridge revenue refunding bonds shall be at least one fourth of one percent (1/4 of 1%) less than the interest rate borne by the bridge revenue bonds to be refunded.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8465; Laws, 1938, ch. 283.

§ 65-25-37.
Bridges and bonds exempt from taxation.

The exercise of the powers conferred by this article constitute the performance of essential governmental functions, and as bridges which are owned and operated by municipalities constitute public property used for public purposes, such bridges shall at all times be free from taxation within the state. No municipality shall be required to pay taxes or assessments upon any such bridge or any part thereof owned by it, whether located within or without the corporate limits of such municipality, and bonds issued under the provisions of this article, their transfer, and the income therefrom (including any profits made on the sale thereof) shall at all times be free from taxation within the state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8466; Laws, 1938, ch. 283.

§ 65-25-39.
Article liberally construed.

This article, being necessary for the welfare of the state and its inhabitants, shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes hereof. But this article shall not be construed to repeal the laws under which any bridge has heretofore been constructed or operated by any county of the state and, as to such counties, the present laws shall remain in force and effect.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8467; Laws, 1938, ch. 283.

§ 65-25-41.
Debt limitations not to apply.

Such bonds may be issued for the purpose herein and, regardless of the amount thereof, same shall not be subject to the limitations as to amount of bonded debt based upon amount of the assessed value of taxable property, in a municipality or county.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8469; Laws, 1938, ch. 283.

§ 65-25-43.
Bridge commission may be created.

The governing authorities of any county or city of this state which has acquired or may hereafter acquire any combined railroad and highway bridge over the Mississippi River, as authorized by Sections 65-23-1 through 65-23-21 or Sections 65-25-1 through 65-25-41, and has issued its bridge revenue bonds for the purpose of financing the cost of such acquisition may, by appropriate resolution, create a commission of not less than five nor more than seven members to manage the affairs of said bridge, said appointees to be qualified electors of such governing body of high character, integrity, and business acumen.

The board of supervisors of such county or the governing authority of such city may, by such resolution, prescribe the tenure of office of such commissioners (but no appointment shall be for a term exceeding five years), may prescribe the duties, powers and rights of such commission and provide for the reasonable compensation, if any, of such commissioners. Said resolution shall not impair or enlarge nor the acts of said commissioners thereunder increase or diminish the obligations of said governing body under the trust indenture or resolution under which the revenue bonds of such body were issued; and the acts of such commissioners shall regularly, and not less than four times each year, be reported to such governing body and be subject to its approval and concurrence.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8469.5; Laws, 1948, ch. 422, §§ 1-4.

§ 65-25-45.
General powers of commissioners.

The commissioners appointed by such governing body or municipality shall, subject to the approval of such governing body, have the following authority, powers and rights: Said commissioners may adopt reasonable bylaws for the conduct of said commission. Said commissioners shall be governed by and fulfill the terms and provisions of the trust indenture or resolution under which the revenue bonds of such governing body were issued, and in so doing the commission shall manage and control the bridge, the approaches thereto, and all appurtenant and physical properties connected therewith, both real and personal, and shall provide for the regular inspection, repair, maintenance and improvement of said bridge and its approaches. Said commission may make any contract and authorize any purchases from the funds realized from the revenues of said bridge and available under the trust indenture or resolution under which the bridge revenue bonds of the governing body were issued for the purposes of repairs, maintenance and improvements, which said contracts and purchases may, in the sound business judgment of the commission, be made without the necessity of prior advertisement or public bids. Said commissioners may employ a superintendent or manager of the bridge properties, fix the amount of his salary, either employ or delegate to said manager the employment of all subordinate personnel, provide for the wages and compensation of such subordinate employees, and shall require the said manager and such other employees as the commissioners may require to give bond, with sufficient surety, to be payable, conditioned and approved as provided by law, in a penalty equal to Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00). The commissioners may place in effect, reclassify, revise and charge a schedule of tolls for transit over said bridge properties, and alter or revise the toll schedule as often as it shall appear necessary or proper; provide for the collection of such tolls and all other revenues and the safe handling and deposit of the funds so received, prepare such budgets and estimates alone or in connection with consulting engineers annually, or for such lesser period of time as may be deemed desirable; provide for an adequate bookkeeping system and regular audits, and keep or cause to be kept full and correct records of finances of said bridge; negotiate for all contracts incidental to or necessary for the proper insurance, maintenance, repair, improvement and operation of said bridge, including employer’s liability insurance with medical benefits for those employed by the commission for the operation and maintenance of said bridge; do and perform all other acts and negotiate for all other contracts which in the sound judgment of the commissioners, meeting with the approval of the governing body issuing the revenue bonds, are desirable or necessary in the interest of the proper, efficient, and economical management and operation of the said bridge and the advancement of the business thereof, all toward the object of fulfilling the obligations in the trust indenture or resolution under which the governing body authorized and issued its revenue bonds, and toward the ultimate freeing of the said bridge from tolls, as to the vehicular portion thereof, at the earliest date possible.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8469.5; Laws, 1948, ch. 422, §§ 1-4; Laws, 1986, ch. 458, § 46, eff from and after October 1, 1986.

§ 65-25-47.
Records of bridge operation kept separate.

The governing body of such county or city shall cause to be kept separate minutes and records of the operation of such bridge properties available for public inspection, which minutes from time to time shall show the approval or disapproval of the actions of said commission. Concerning the management and operation of said bridge by the commission and the governing body of said city or county, there shall be no obligation on said commission, nor shall there be any general obligation on said city or county, other than from the revenues derived from the operation of said bridge properties and as may be set forth or provided for in the trust indenture or resolution under which the revenue bonds of such governing body were issued for the acquisition of said bridge properties.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8469.5; Laws, 1948, ch. 422, §§ 1-4.

§ 65-25-49.
Commission to manage certain bridges.

The governing authorities of any county or city of this state which has acquired or may hereafter acquire any combined railroad and highway bridge over the Mississippi River, as authorized by Sections 65-23-1 through 65-23-21 or Sections 65-25-1 through 65-25-41, and which has discharged the bridge revenue bonds which were issued for the purpose of financing the cost of such acquisition and has freed the bridge as to the vehicular portion thereof from tolls may, by appropriate resolution, create a commission of five members to manage the affairs of said bridge, said appointees to be qualified electors of such governing body of high character, integrity, and business acumen; and, if such governing body has already created a commission under the provisions of Sections 65-25-43 through 65-25-47, then in lieu of creating another commission, the governing authorities of such county or city may, by order entered upon the minutes of such authority, continue the present commission in effect.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8469.5-01; Laws, 1966, ch. 315, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved June 15, 1966).